Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-203 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Human growth and development curriculum shall be taught in
the public schools of this state. Human growth and development
education shall include, but is not limited to:
1. Human biology related to pregnancy;
2. Human development inside of a womb;
3. A high-definition ultrasound video, at least three (3)
minutes in duration, showing the development of the fetus in a
biological woman; and
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1603 Page 1

4. A high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation
showing the process of fetal development, highlighting significant
markers in cell growth and organ development until birth.
B. School districts shall provide the curriculum described in
subsection A of this section to students if the student's parent or
legal guardian completes an opt-in permission form. Schools may
incorporate the curriculum into an existing course or courses or
develop curriculum for a separate course. Schools shall provide
parents and legal guardians an opt-in permission form to authorize
their child be taught the curriculum described in subsection A of
this section two (2) weeks prior to the date the curriculum is to be
taught. The opt-in permission shall be on a form prescribed by the
State Board of Education and retained by the school district.
C. In order to graduate from a public high school accredited by
the State Board of Education with a standard diploma, students in
grades nine through twelve shall receive human growth and
development instruction as described in subsection A of this section
unless the student's parent or legal guardian did not complete an
opt-in permission form as provided for in subsection B of this
section or the student has an Individualized Education Program (IEP)
for a significant cognitive disability. Such instruction shall be
integrated into health or science education and shall be
incorporated into the state academic content standards adopted by

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1603 Page 2

the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 11-103.6 of Title
70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate













ENGR. H. B. NO. 1603 Page 3